Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1733
Order; appeal; procedure.

Any order or decision of the director may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 31.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.